Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 7 Sessions of Supreme and Superior Courts

8-7-1.
Supreme court sessions.

The supreme court shall be in session at Providence from the first Monday in October in each year to the second Monday in July in the succeeding year and at such other times as the court shall deem proper, with a recess from the third Monday in February to the first Monday in March; provided, that the court may hold sessions at other places within the state whenever it may deem advisable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-1

.

8-7-2.
Sessions of superior court.

The superior court shall be in session every year as follows:

At Providence, for the counties of Providence and Bristol, on a continuous basis; provided, that the presiding justice shall determine the duration of the various court calendars;

Within and for the county of Newport, for a period of not less than thirty-six (36) weeks during the court year;

Within and for the county of Kent, for a period of not less than thirty-six (36) weeks during the court year;

Within and for the county of Washington, for a period of not less than thirty-six (36) weeks during the court year;

At such other times and places as the presiding justice shall fix and determine; provided, that the superior court held within and for the counties of Providence and Bristol shall from time to time make up lists of causes to be tried at Woonsocket and shall sit at Woonsocket for a term of not less than twelve (12) weeks during the court year; and provided, further, that any trial in any of the counties commenced within any regular or special session may be continued thereafter with the consent of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 38; P.L. 1907, ch. 1441, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 2; P.L. 1931, ch. 1775, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 2; P.L. 1939, ch. 704, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3498, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3729, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 51; P.L. 1971, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 255, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 429, § 1.

8-7-3.
Superior court motion days.

The superior court shall be in session for the purpose of hearing motions in the various counties during the calendar year at such times and places as the presiding justice shall fix and determine.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 40; P.L. 1907, ch. 1441, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 4; P.L. 1931, ch. 1775, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3729, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-3

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 3; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 51.

8-7-4 — 8-7-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 41 — 43; P.L. 1907, ch. 1441, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, §§ 5 — 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, §§ 5 — 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, §§ 5 — 7; P.L. 1956, ch. 3729, § 2; G.L. 1956, §§

8-7-4

— 8-7-6; P.L. 1959, ch. 172, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 52.

8-7-7.
Adjournment in absence of quorum or presiding justice.

In the absence of a quorum of the supreme court, the justices in attendance may adjourn. In case of the absence of any justice of the superior court from any trial pending before him or her, any other justice of the court may adjourn the trial.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 44; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-7

.

8-7-8.
Adjournment of superior court by clerk.

Whenever, at any time appointed for the sitting of the superior court, no justice thereof shall be in attendance, the clerk may adjourn the court from day to day until otherwise ordered by a justice of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 45; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-8

.

8-7-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 39; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 3; P.L. 1956, ch. 3729, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-9

; Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 255, § 1. For related provisions see §§

8-7-2

,

8-7-3

and

8-7-10

, Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 77, Super. Ct. R. Cr. P. Rule 56.

8-7-10.
Superior court always open for business.

The superior court shall be always open for the transaction of all business; but no business shall be transacted on Sunday or on a legal holiday, unless the court shall deem it necessary, with the exception of the twenty-second day of February (as Washington’s birthday) and the fourth day of May (as Rhode Island Independence Day).

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 46; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-10

; P.L. 1968, ch. 4, § 1.

8-7-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 47; P.L. 1908, ch. 1533, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 275, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 325, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 498, § 11; P.L. 1939, ch. 704, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-7-11

; P.L. 1967, ch. 92, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 255, § 1. For present law see RP 1.4.